Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 259 Strays and Animals Running at Large

259.010.
Cattle not to run at large where highways are under construction. [Repealed.]

259.020.
County, justice’s district or precinct may prohibit cattle from running at large. [Repealed.]

259.030.
Petition for election; time of election. [Repealed.]

259.040.
Fiscal court to decide how much territory election to apply to; decision and election result to last four years. [Repealed.]

259.050.
Petitioners to pay cost of election. [Repealed.]

259.060.
Notice of election to be given. [Repealed.]

259.070.
Question to be placed on ballots. [Repealed.]

259.080.
Declaration and record of election results. [Repealed.]

259.090.
Effect of election. [Repealed.]

259.100.
What allegations are sufficient in prosecution. [Repealed.]

259.105.
Definitions for chapter.

The following definitions apply in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Local government” means any city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government;

“Stray cattle” means any animal of the bovine, ovine, porcine, or caprine species for which the owner is no longer claiming ownership or for which the owner cannot be determined, but not including any member of the equine species; and

“Stray equine” means any animal of the equine species for which the owner is no longer claiming ownership or for which the owner cannot be determined.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

259.110.
Stray equine may be taken up — By whom — When.

A stray equine may be taken up and posted by any person or entity if it is found running at large outside of its enclosure or if it can be determined from the circumstances that its owner has abandoned it. Stray cattle may be taken up and posted by any freeholder by legal or equitable title or by a tenant of an unexpired lease for not less than three (3) years when found on his place of residence.

History.

4652, 4653; 2010, ch. 92, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

259.120.
Method of taking up and posting stray equines and stray cattle — Fees.

Stray equines and stray cattle shall be taken up and posted in the following manner:

Documentation of stray equines shall be taken before a county judge/executive of the district, who shall administer to the taker-up an oath, in substance, that the equine was taken up by him as a stray and that he has not defaced or altered the marks, brands, or other identifiers, including but not limited to microchips or freeze brands, of the equine.

Documentation of stray cattle shall be taken before a county judge/executive of the district, who shall administer to the taker-up an oath, in substance that the cattle were taken by him as strays on his premises within the preceding ten (10) days and that he has not defaced or altered the marks or brands of the cattle.

Duties of the county judge/executive pertaining to stray equines shall be to:

Contract with a licensed veterinarian, who shall document the stray equine’s breed, color, sex, marks, brands, scars, and other distinguishing features, perform a microchip scan, and identify the existence of lip tattoos, freeze brands, or microchips;

Record the veterinarian’s findings, the name and residence of the taker-up, and the location of the stray equine in a book to be kept by him for that purpose;

Maintain documentation in electronic and paper format; and

Send a copy of the documentation of the stray equine to the Office of the State Veterinarian, who shall post notification on the Office of the State Veterinarian’s Web site. The Office of the State Veterinarian shall post one (1) photograph of the stray equine’s front view, including its head and feet, and one (1) photograph of the stray equine’s side view from muzzle to tail;

The county judge/executive shall give to the taker-up a copy of the documentation for the record and immediately deliver to the county clerk a certified copy of the same record;

The clerk shall immediately record the stray certificate of the county judge/executive as provided by the taker-up in a book to be kept by him for that purpose;

The taker-up shall immediately post a copy of the county judge/executive’s certificate in the sheriff’s office with jurisdiction over the area where the stray cattle or stray equine was taken up after he has posted the stray. Hold time for stray equines shall begin after all documentation has been properly filed and posted by the county judge/executive and taker-up; and

If ownership is found from identifiers of the stray equine such as lip tattoos, freeze brands, or microchips, efforts shall be made by the county/judge executive or his designee to ascertain the owner by investigatory due diligence in locating the owner and providing notice before holding time expires. The owner/claimants of the stray equine shall reimburse the county judge/executive for the cost of the veterinarian’s assessment per the contracted agreement.

The taker-up shall be paid by the owner of the stray, if and when he claims the stray or its value, the actual itemized costs incurred by the taker-up for keeping the stray equine or cattle. In the event that a dispute arises relating to ownership, adverse claimants, third-party claims or liens, value of the equine, or actual itemized expenses incurred, the parties may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the stray equine was taken up. The filing of an action under this paragraph shall toll holding time as to vesting of ownership interests.

The taker-up may have the stray equine sterilized only after the fifteen (15) day holding period has expired and ownership vested pursuant to KRS

259.130

, and any pending court cases pertaining to the stray equine have been resolved.

HISTORY:

4657: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 178; 2010, ch. 92, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 13, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

259.130.
Property vests in taker-up after fifteen days following posting.

The absolute ownership of a stray equine shall vest in the taker-up at the expiration of fifteen (15) days after the county judge/executive has received the evidence of the required documentation, administered the oath to the taker-up, and the county judge/executive and taker-up have filed and posted the required documentation pursuant to KRS

259.120

. The absolute ownership of stray cattle shall vest in the taker-up after the expiration of twelve (12) months from the day on which the cattle have been posted.

HISTORY:

4654; 2010, ch. 92, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 13, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

259.140.
Taker-up to pay owner value of stray equines or cattle, when — Limitation of liability.

If cattle taken up under KRS

259.120

are sold for a profit before absolute ownership of the stray cattle has vested in the taker-up as provided by KRS

259.130

, then the taker-up shall pay to the owner upon demand and proof of ownership the amount received for the stray cattle less the amount owed by the owner to the taker-up under KRS

259.120

. The owner shall not be entitled to any payment from the taker-up under this section if demand for payment is made more than fifteen (15) days after the posting of the stray equine and vesting of ownership pursuant to KRS

259.130

or more than twelve (12) months after the posting of the stray cattle under KRS 259.120.

County judges/executive or participating state agency, county clerks, and all other local government employees acting in good faith in the discharge of the duties imposed by KRS

259.105

,

259.110

,

259.120

,

259.130

, and this section shall be immune from criminal and civil liability for any act related to the taking up and posting of stray equines or stray cattle.

HISTORY:

4655; 2010, ch. 92, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 13, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

259.150.
Altering marks, removal and destruction of strays prohibited. [Repealed.]

259.160.
Horse, jack or bull running at large may be taken up — Notice when owner known. [Repealed.]

259.170.
Animal taken up to be gelded. [Repealed.]

259.180.
Owner of animal unknown — Notice — Gelding. [Repealed.]

259.190.
Fees of taker-up — Property vests in taker-up, when — Recovery by owner. [Repealed.]

259.200.
Trespassing on park, camp grounds or floodwalls prohibited.

No person shall permit any cattle to run or trespass upon any state or national parks, encampment grounds, scout camps, grounds dedicated to religious, educational or recreational purposes or floodwalls erected at public expense.

History.

4645n-2: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 229, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The legislature has seen fit to impose fines on persons who permit cattle to run or trespass on certain public lands but apparently no broader criminal liabilty for trespassing animals has been imposed.

OAG 82-262

.

259.210.
Cattle not to run at large — Damages — Lien, impounding — Powers of cities.

No person shall permit any cattle owned by him or under his control or in his custody, to run at large.

If any damage is committed by cattle permitted to run at large, the owner of the cattle shall be liable for all damages, whether the place where the damages occurred is inclosed by lawful fence or not. The person damaged shall have a lien on the cattle committing the damage for the amount of the damage and cost of suit.

The sheriff or any other peace officer shall impound any cattle found running at large in the county, and the owner or bailee of the cattle shall pay to the officer impounding, for each head impounded, one dollar ($1) and the cost of feeding and taking care of the cattle, but the cost of impounding any number of cattle shall not exceed three dollars ($3) and the cost of feeding. The sheriff or any other peace officer shall have a lien on the cattle impounded for his fees and expenses, which he may enforce in the same manner in which mortgage liens are enforced.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting any powers possessed by cities to regulate cattle running at large.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 20, §§ 1 to 4.

259.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

259.200

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), and each head of cattle trespassing shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates KRS

259.210

shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

History.

4645m-4, 4645n-2, 4656: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 20, § 5; 1954, ch. 229, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.